Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.245.010

Skill centers—Purpose—Operation.

A skill center is a regional career and technical education partnership established to provide access to comprehensive industry-defined career and technical programs of study that prepare students for careers, employment, apprenticeships, and postsecondary education. A skill center is operated by a host school district and governed by an administrative council in accordance with a cooperative agreement.

[ 2007 c 463 s 2.]